Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 7.
INITIATIVE AND REFERENDUM (CONST., ART. 5, § 1, AMENDED).

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment amended Const., Art. 5, § 1, and is incorporated therein. The amendment was adopted at the general election of Nov. 2, 1920, by a vote of 86,360 for and 43,662 against. It was declared lost by the Speaker of the House on Jan. 15, 1921, but was declared adopted in Brickhouse v. Hill, 167 Ark. 513, 268 S.W. 865 (1925).